Maine, session 132, LD573.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend provisions of law as necessary to improve the collection
of penalties for violations of labor protection laws.
Page 1 - 132LR2148(01)